District of Columbia statutes.
9-1113.02

Payment by Mayor of District’s share of acquisition cost authorized.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to contract with the Transit Authority for payment to it of the District’s share of the cost to the Transit Authority of acquiring:

(1)

The private bus companies referred to in § 9-1113.01(a); and

(2)

Any rolling stock, real estate, or other capital resources required for the operation of bus service in the District of Columbia either at the time of acquisition of such bus companies or at some future time.

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1002, Pub. L. 92-517, title II, § 201(a)
1981 Ed., § 1-2472.
1973 Ed., § 1-1462.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.